Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-1130
Preemption of local law.

The Data Privacy Act supersedes and preempts any ordinance, resolution, rule, or other regulation adopted by a political subdivision regarding the processing of personal data by a controller or processor.

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 30.
January 1, 2025